District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Senior Citizen Tax Cap Transfer Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section § 47-864 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding
a new subsection (h) to read as follows:
“(h)(1) For a Class 1 property that is owned at least 50%, in whole or in part, by one or
more individuals 65 years of age or older, the owner-occupant residential tax credit may be
transferred, on a percentage basis, from the property being sold to a replacement Class 1 property
purchased within 12 months after the date of sale and owned at least 50% in the aggregate by the
same individuals 65 years of age or older.


“(2) The transferable value of the benefits listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
not exceed the dollar value of those benefits applied to the property being sold in the tax year
immediately preceding the transfer.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).